Massachusetts, session 194th, S2584.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the Massachusetts
Department of Elementary and Secondary Education shall establish a sick leave bank for Irene
O'Rourke, an employee of the Executive Office of Health and Human Services. Any employee of
the Executive Office of Health and Human Services may voluntarily contribute 1 or more sick,
personal or vacation days to the sick leave bank for use by Irene O'Rourke. If Irene O'Rourke
terminates employment with the Executive Office of Health and Human Services or requests to
dissolve the sick leave bank, any remaining time in the sick leave bank shall be transferred to the
extended illness leave bank. Sick leave bank days shall not be used for absences unrelated to the
illness or disability that necessitated the establishment of the sick leave bank as determined by
the Executive Office of Health and Human Services.
of 1